incubator/apertium-ga-gv/apertium-ga-gv.ga.dix
    <pardef n="ais/ig__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagfar</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagfaidh</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagfaimid</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagfaidh</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagfaidh</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagfaidh</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagfaidh</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagfaí</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagfainn</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagfaimis</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagfá</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagfadh</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagfadh</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagfaidís</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagaim</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagaimis</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ig</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagaigí</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagadh</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagaidís</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagadh</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ig</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagamar</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ig</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ig</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ig</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagadar</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagtaí</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagainn</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagaimis</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagtá</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagadh</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagadh</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagaidís</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagtha</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagtha</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagtha</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagtha</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagtar</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagaim</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagaimid</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagann</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagann</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagann</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagann</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eaga</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagaimid</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eaga</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eaga</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eaga</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eaga</l>
          <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="gr/eann__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inn</l>
          <r>eann<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eann</l>
          <r>eann<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="táthfhéithleann"><par n="initial-t"/><i>áthfhéithl</i><par n="gr/eann__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="coiteann"><par n="initial-c"/><i>oit</i><par n="gr/eann__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="focheann"><par n="initial-f"/><i>och</i><par n="gr/eann__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="aisig"><par n="initial-a"/><i>is</i><par n="ais/ig__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="eidheann"><par n="initial-e"/><i>idh</i><par n="gr/eann__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="fochraiceann"><par n="initial-f"/><i>ochraic</i><par n="gr/eann__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="athchraiceann"><par n="initial-a"/><i>thchraic</i><par n="gr/eann__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="snaschraiceann"><par n="initial-s"/><i>naschraic</i><par n="gr/eann__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="fadcheann"><par n="initial-f"/><i>adch</i><par n="gr/eann__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="míghreann"><par n="initial-m"/><i>íghr</i><par n="gr/eann__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="greann"><par n="initial-g"/><i>r</i><par n="gr/eann__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="aiteann"><par n="initial-a"/><i>it</i><par n="gr/eann__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="seancheann"><par n="initial-s"/><i>eanch</i><par n="gr/eann__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ifreann"><par n="initial-i"/><i>fr</i><par n="gr/eann__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="féithleann"><par n="initial-f"/><i>éithl</i><par n="gr/eann__n_m"/></e>
